test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NA_C_zhiishiib_gt-glossing.yaml
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibenyminwibniing
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: zhiishiibensmiwaabniin
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibensmiwaabniing
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: zhiishiibensminwibniin
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibensminwibniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nzhiishiibenyshinaanbaniin
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nzhiishiibenyshinaanbaniing
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nzhiishiibenyshinaanbaniig
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nzhiishiibensshinaanbaniin
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nzhiishiibensshinaanbaniing
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nzhiishiibensshinaanbaniig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gzhiishiibenyshinaanbaniin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gzhiishiibenyshinaanbaniing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gzhiishiibenyshinaanbaniig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gzhiishiibenyshiwaabniin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gzhiishiibenyshiwaabniing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gzhiishiibenyshiwaabniig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gzhiishiibensshinaanbaniin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gzhiishiibensshinaanbaniing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gzhiishiibensshinaanbaniig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gzhiishiibensshiwaabniin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gzhiishiibensshiwaabniing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gzhiishiibensshiwaabniig
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: zhiishiibenyshiwaabniin
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibenyshiwaabniing
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: zhiishiibenyshinwibniin
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibenyshinwibniing
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: zhiishiibensshiwaabniin
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibensshiwaabniing
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: zhiishiibensshinwibniin
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibensshinwibniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nzhiishiibmishnaanbaniin
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nzhiishiibmishnaanbaniing
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nzhiishiibmishnaanbaniig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gzhiishiibmishnaanbaniin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gzhiishiibmishnaanbaniing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gzhiishiibmishnaanbaniig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gzhiishiibmishwaabniin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gzhiishiibmishwaabniing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gzhiishiibmishwaabniig
     3+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: zhiishiibmishwaabniin
     3+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibmishwaabniing
     3+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: zhiishiibmishniwbaniin
     3+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibmishniwbaniing
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nzhiishiibenymishnaanbaniin
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nzhiishiibenymishnaanbaniing
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nzhiishiibenymishnaanbaniig
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nzhiishiibensmishnaanbaniin
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nzhiishiibensmishnaanbaniing
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nzhiishiibensmishnaanbaniig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gzhiishiibenymishnaanbaniin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gzhiishiibenymishnaanbaniing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gzhiishiibenymishnaanbaniig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gzhiishiibenymishwaabniin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gzhiishiibenymishwaabniing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gzhiishiibenymishwaabniig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gzhiishiibensmishnaanbaniin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gzhiishiibensmishnaanbaniing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gzhiishiibensmishnaanbaniig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gzhiishiibensmishwaabniin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gzhiishiibensmishwaabniing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gzhiishiibensmishwaabniig
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: zhiishiibenymishwaabniin
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibenymishwaabniing
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: zhiishiibenymishniwbaniin
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibenymishniwbaniing
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: zhiishiibensmishwaabniin
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibensmishwaabniing
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: zhiishiibensmishniwbaniin
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibensmishniwbaniing
     
